District of Columbia statutes.
37-104

Market operation.

Eastern Market shall be operated primarily as an indoor urban fresh food market and an outdoor Farmers’ Line, with a community arts center and public meeting space in the North Hall, with an arts and crafts market and a flea market on the North Plaza, and with compatible uses in the Center Hall.

History

Apr. 16, 1999, D.C. Law 12-228, § 5, 46 DCR 1066

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 10-304.